Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-261
County agricultural society; budget; meetings; records.

(1) County agricultural societies are subject to the Nebraska Budget Act. County agricultural societies shall comply with the Open Meetings Act and the Records Management Act.

(2) The budget of each county agricultural society is subject to annual review, audit, and approval by the county board of the county in which such society is located.

Laws 1879, § 12, p. 400;

R.S.1913, § 8;

C.S.1922, § 8;

C.S.1929, § 2-203;

R.S.1943, § 2-206;

Laws 1996, LB 299, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 2-206;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 12;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 3.

Nebraska Budget Act, see section 13-501.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.

Nebraska State Board of Agriculture is still authorized to adopt rules and regulations which county agricultural societies must comply with and obey to entitle them to financial support from county board. State ex rel. Otoe County Agr. Assn. v. Wallen, 117 Neb. 397, 220 N.W. 688 (1928).